Hawaii statutes.
§706-646 Victim restitution. (1)
As used in this section, "victim" includes any of the following:

(a) The direct victim of a crime including a
business entity, trust, or governmental entity;

(b) If the victim dies as a result of the crime, a
surviving relative of the victim as defined in chapter 351;

(c) A governmental entity that has reimbursed the
victim for losses arising as a result of the crime or paid for medical care
provided to the victim as a result of the crime; or

(d) Any duly incorporated humane society or duly
incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, contracted with
the county or State to enforce animal-related statutes or ordinances, that
impounds, holds, or receives custody of a pet animal pursuant to section 711-1109.1,
711-1109.2, or 711‑1110.5; provided that this section does not apply to
costs that have already been contracted and provided for by the counties or
State.

(2) The court shall order the defendant to
make restitution for reasonable and verified losses suffered by the victim or
victims as a result of the defendant's offense when requested by the victim.
The court shall order restitution to be paid to the crime victim compensation
commission in the event that the victim has been given an award for compensation
under chapter 351. If the court orders payment of a fine in addition to
restitution or a compensation fee, or both, the payment of restitution and
compensation fee shall have priority over the payment of the fine, and payment
of restitution shall have priority over payment of a compensation fee.

(3) In ordering restitution, the court shall
not consider the defendant's financial ability to make restitution in
determining the amount of restitution to order. The court, however, shall
consider the defendant's financial ability to make restitution for the purpose
of establishing the time and manner of payment. The court shall specify the
time and manner in which restitution is to be paid. Restitution shall be a
dollar amount that is sufficient to reimburse any victim fully for losses,
including but not limited to:

(a) Full value of stolen or damaged property, as
determined by replacement costs of like property, or the actual or estimated
cost of repair, if repair is possible;

(b) Medical expenses; and

(c) Funeral and burial expenses incurred as a result
of the crime.

(4) The restitution ordered shall not affect
the right of a victim to recover under section 351-33 or in any manner provided
by law; provided that any amount of restitution actually recovered by the
victim under this section shall be deducted from any award under section
351-33. [L 1998, c 269, pt of §1; am L 1999, c 18, §17; am L 2006, c 230, §22;
am L 2012, c 211, §5; am L 2013, c 207, §1]

COMMENTARY ON §706-646

Act 269, Session Laws 1998, added this section and §706-647
to allow victims of crime to enforce a criminal restitution order in the same
manner as a civil judgment. This section also includes within the definition
of "victim" a governmental entity which has reimbursed the victim for
losses arising as a result of the crime, and allows the court to order
restitution to be paid to the criminal injuries compensation commission if the
victim has been given an award for compensation by the commission. Under
current law, a defendant may be required by the court to pay restitution for
losses caused to the victim. Collection of the restitution was left to
governmental entities such as the judiciary, paroling authority, and department
of public safety; these entities often were able to collect only a small
fraction of the amount. Moreover, although the criminal injuries compensation
commission helped victims by providing some compensation, victims of property
crimes and some violent crimes were ineligible for any compensation from the
commission. Furthermore, although a victim may bring a civil action against
the defendant, the process was costly and time-consuming. The legislature
believed that victims should have a "fast track" ability to be
compensated for their losses by allowing victims to enforce the criminal
restitution order as a civil judgment, using all of the civil collection
remedies. Conference Committee Report No. 89, Senate Standing Committee Report
No. 3008.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended this section to, among
other things, require that when restitution is ordered, the amount ordered is
not based on the defendant's financial ability to make restitution, but the
defendant's financial ability to make restitution [shall] be considered in
establishing the time and manner of payment. House Standing Committee Report
No. 665-06.

Act 211, Session Laws 2012, amended this section by
making a conforming amendment to include medical assistance provided by the
State as an expense for which restitution may be ordered to conform with
amendments made to other sections in the Hawaii Revised Statutes by Act 211.
The legislature found that the medicaid program's ability to recover moneys
from third parties to which it was entitled must be strengthened to maintain
the viability of the medicaid program. Act 211 would assist the medicaid
program in recovering those moneys, thereby reducing the burden on the program
imposed by third parties and helping to ensure that the program is
sustainable. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3314.

Act 207, Session Laws 2013, amended subsection (1) by
expanding the definition of "victim" to: (1) include duly
incorporated humane societies or duly incorporated societies for the prevention
of cruelty to animals, contracted with the county or State, in order to provide
those societies with restitution for reasonable and verified losses suffered;
and (2) provide that duly incorporated humane societies or duly incorporated
societies for the prevention of cruelty to animals, contracted with the county
or State, should not receive restitution as a victim for costs that have
already been contracted and provided for by the counties or State. The
legislature found that in a recent decision, the circuit court of the first
circuit denied restitution to the Hawaiian Humane Society for their expenses
incurred in caring for one hundred fifty-three dogs previously subjected to
animal cruelty in the second degree. The court held that the Hawaiian Humane
Society was not a government agency or a "direct victim" of the crime
committed. Although the Hawaiian Humane Society assumed care of the dogs and
became the legal owner of all of the dogs upon forfeiture proceedings, the
court held that it was not the "actual owner" and was not entitled to
restitution under this section. Act 207 provided clear language to allow any
duly incorporated humane society contracted with a county or State to receive
restitution for expenses incurred when caring for an animal as a result of
animal forfeiture or impoundment. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 1294,
Conference Committee Report No. 19.

Case Notes

Defendant's argument that a crime victim who received
indemnification from an insurer did not suffer a "loss" within the
meaning of this section was without merit; the only exception for or reduction
of restitution plainly stated in this section is that any amount actually
recovered by the victim from the criminal should be deducted from the amount
the victim might recover from the crime victim compensation special fund
pursuant to §351-33. 121 H. 135 (App.), 214 P.3d 1125 (2009).

Trial court properly ordered defendant to repay the full
amount of losses to employer without reduction for amounts paid by insurance,
which furthered the rehabilitative purposes of this section to the greatest
extent possible; if defendant was not required to pay any restitution,
defendant would not have righted the wrong defendant committed and no
rehabilitative purpose would be achieved; the interests of justice would not be
served by allowing a thief to retain or otherwise benefit from the spoils of
the thief's crime simply because the thief picked a victim who was prudent
enough to have obtained insurance. 121 H. 135 (App.), 214 P.3d 1125 (2009).

Where defendant was ordered to pay restitution to employer,
the direct victim of defendant's crime, not employer's insurer, defendant's
sentence complied with subsection (1). 121 H. 135 (App.), 214 P.3d 1125 (2009).

Where (1) traffic accident victim, and not defendant, caused
the accident, (2) it appeared that victim's vehicle flipped over on its roof
causing victim's immediate death upon impact, and (3) there was no evidence in
the record that defendant's criminal misconduct of failing to remain at the
scene of the accident, provide information, and render reasonable assistance
pursuant to §§291C-12 and 291C-14 caused victim's injuries or death, no nexus
between defendant's conduct and victim's injuries and death had been
demonstrated; thus, restitution could not be imposed under this section. 121
H. 191 (App.), 216 P.3d 117 (2009).

District court erred by ordering defendant to pay
restitution for victim's lost wages under subsection (3); restitution for wage
loss was contrary to the legislative intent behind this section, and thus, lost
wages were not compensable as restitution. 130 H. 332 (App.), 310 P.3d 1033
(2013).

In light of this section's requirement that the restitution
amount be "reasonable and verified" and that the victim is in the
best position to provide information regarding and verification of his or her
losses caused by the defendant, where restitution is contested, the burden to
present a prima facie showing regarding restitution request is best placed on
the prosecution who brings the restitution motion on behalf of the victim of
the crime. 130 H. 332 (App.), 310 P.3d 1033 (2013).

Portion of restitution award for medical expenses
vacated and remanded where district court found there was a basis in evidence
to conclude defendant caused injury and resultant expenses to victim, while
recognizing that victim had a preexisting neck condition and had been receiving
treatment, but ruled no apportionment was possible where no expert medical
opinion or competent medical evidence was presented; conclusion was at odds
with the court's findings regarding the worsening of the victim's condition and
consequential change in victim's medical treatment and based on a misconception
that imposition of all medical expenses could be made on defendant where there
was insufficient evidence upon which to base an apportionment. 130 H. 332
(App.), 310 P.3d 1033 (2013).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next